Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2513
Incentive payment; amount.

Except as provided in section 39-2514, the incentive payment to the various municipalities or municipal counties shall be based on the class of license of the city street superintendent appointed and employed by the municipality or municipal counties and on the population of each municipality or urbanized area of each municipal county, as determined by the most recent federal census figures certified by the Tax Commissioner as provided in section 77-3,119, according to the following table:

PopulationClass B LicenseClass A LicensePaymentPaymentNot more than 500$300.00$600.00501 to 1,000$500.00$1,000.001,001 to 2,500$1,500.00$3,000.002,501 to 5,000$2,000.00$4,000.005,001 to 10,000$3,000.00$6,000.0010,001 to 20,000$3,500.00$7,000.0020,001 to 40,000$3,750.00$7,500.0040,001 to 200,000$4,000.00$8,000.00200,001 and more$4,250.00$8,500.00

Laws 1969, c. 316, § 3, p. 1139;

Laws 1993, LB 726, § 9;

Laws 1994, LB 1127, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 47;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 19;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 19.